Mississippi, session 2026, SB2798.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  For the purposes of this act, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Mask" means any face covering mask, device or hood whereby any portion of the face is so hidden or covered as to conceal the identity of the wearer. (b)  "Public place" means all walks, alleys, boulevards, avenues, lanes, roads, highways or other ways or thoroughfares dedicated to public use or owned or maintained by a public authority, and all outdoor grounds and buildings owned, leased by, operated or maintained by a public authority. (2)  No person shall, while wearing any mask as defined in subsection (1) of this section, enter, be present or appear in any outdoor public place within this state. (3)  The following are exempted from the provisions of subsection (2) of this section: (a)  Any person under fourteen (14) years of age; (b)  Any person sixty (60) years of age or older; (c)  Any person wearing a mask for health and safety reasons, including, but not limited to, the prevention of illness, protection of respiratory health, protection from environmental hazards including weather or by order of a public authority; (d)  Any person wearing a mask due to participation in a celebratory, holiday, recreational or cultural event, including parades, festivals, theatrical productions and sporting events, where masks are customarily worn; (e)  Any person wearing a gas mask in drills, exercises or emergencies; and (f)  Any person engaging in an activity such that the wearing of the mask is protected by the Constitution of the State of Mississippi or the United States Constitution, including, but not limited to, the free exercise of religion. (4)  Law enforcement officers shall not stop or detain an individual solely on the basis that they are wearing a mask. (5)  (a)  Violation of this section is punishable by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or up to ninety (90) days confinement, or both. (b)  If the court finds that a violator was committing or attempting to commit a crime of violence while in violation of this section, the penalty is increased to a fine of up to One Thousand Dollars ($1000.00) or up to six (6) months in jail, or both. (6)  If any provision of this section, or the application of any provision to any person or circumstance, is held to be invalid, the remainder of this act and the application of its provisions to any other person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.